District of Columbia statutes.
44-1102.19

Repealed

Representation and indemnification.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 219, 43 DCR 4962
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1602(b), 46 DCR 6373
July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 9(a), 48 DCR 4047
1981 Ed., § 32-262.19.
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 44-1101.01.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1602(b) of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
For temporary (90-day) authorization of application date of section, see § 1603 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
D.C. Law 13-38, title XVI, § 1603, provided: “Sec. 1603. Applicability date. Section 1602(b) of this title shall be applicable from the date of the Board’s first meeting under section 204(h) of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Act of 1996, effective April 9, 1997 (D.C. Law 11-212; D.C. Code § 32-262.4(h) [§ 44-1102.04(h), 2001 Ed.])”.